Hawaii, session 2026, HB1577.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii's emergency response system must continually adapt to protect the State's residents, including kupuna and individuals with disabilities, access needs, or other functional needs.  While the counties currently operate or participate in voluntary emergency safety profile systems, those systems are not consistently available statewide, leaving potential gaps in preparedness, dispatcher awareness, and first responder coordination. The legislature further finds that Smart911 and similar statewide safety profile systems allow residents to create voluntary profiles providing secure medical, mobility, communication, and disability-related information to be made available to 911 dispatchers.  This information is available only at the time of an emergency call and enhances the ability of emergency responders to deliver timely, appropriate, and life-saving assistance. The purpose of this Act is to require a statewide, voluntary safety profile system like Smart911 to be integrated into Hawaii's 911 services to improve emergency preparedness and response for all residents, particularly vulnerable populations. SECTION 2.  Chapter 138, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§138-     Statewide emergency safety profile system. (a)  The board shall establish, implement, and maintain a statewide emergency safety profile system that allows residents to voluntarily create and manage secure personal profiles containing information relevant to emergency response efforts, including information related to any: (1)  Medical conditions; (2)  Disabilities, access needs, or other functional needs; (3)  Mobility limitations or use of assistive devices; (4)  Emergency contacts; (5)  Communication needs or sensory considerations; and (6)  Household information useful for emergency response. (b) Information in a safety profile shall be made available only to a public safety answering point at the time a 911-related call is initiated from a phone number or device associated with the profile. (c) The board may contract with a vendor to provide a statewide safety profile platform, including the system commonly referred to as "Smart911" or any functionally equivalent system that meets national public safety and cybersecurity standards. (d) The statewide emergency safety profile system shall: (1)  Be available in all counties; (2)  Integrate with existing and future 911 technologies, including next-generation 911 systems; (3)  Support multiple languages; (4)  Ensure the confidentiality and security of resident information; and (5)  Include public education and outreach activities to promote awareness and participation, particularly among kupuna and individuals having disabilities, access needs, or other functional needs." SECTION 3.  Section 138-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§138-3  911 fund.  (a)  There is established outside the state treasury a special fund, to be known as the 911 fund, to be administered by the board. (b)  The fund shall consist of amounts collected under section 138-4. (c)  The board shall place the funds in an interest-bearing account at any federally insured financial institution, separate and apart from the general fund of the State. (d)  Moneys in the fund shall be expended exclusively by the board for the purposes of [ensuring adequate funding to deploy and sustain 911 service, developing] this chapter, including: (1)  Implementing, operating, maintaining, and conducting public education on 911 services; (2)  Developing and funding future 911 technologies[, and funding]; (3)  Establishing, implementing, maintaining, and marketing the statewide emergency safety profile system under section 138-   ; and (4)  Funding expenses of administering the fund." SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________